Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1007.11
School district
formula need; calculation.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
for school fiscal years 2013-14 through 2015-16, each school district's
formula need shall equal the difference of the sum of the school district's
basic funding, poverty allowance, limited English proficiency allowance, focus
school and program allowance, summer school allowance, special receipts allowance,
transportation allowance, elementary site allowance, instructional time allowance,
teacher education allowance, distance education and telecommunications allowance,
averaging adjustment, new learning community transportation adjustment, student
growth adjustment, any positive student growth adjustment correction, and
new school adjustment, minus the sum of the limited English proficiency allowance
correction, poverty allowance correction, and any negative student growth
adjustment correction.

(2) Except
as otherwise provided in this section, for school fiscal year 2016-17 and
each school fiscal year thereafter, each school district's formula need shall
equal the difference of the sum of the school district's basic funding, poverty
allowance, limited English proficiency allowance, focus school and program
allowance, summer school allowance, special receipts allowance, transportation
allowance, elementary site allowance, distance education and telecommunications
allowance, averaging adjustment, new learning community transportation adjustment,
student growth adjustment, any positive student growth adjustment correction,
and new school adjustment, minus the sum of the limited English proficiency
allowance correction, poverty allowance correction, and any negative student
growth adjustment correction.

(3) If the
formula need calculated for a school district pursuant to subsections (1)
and (2) of this section is less than one hundred percent of the formula need
for such district for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, the formula need for such district
shall equal one hundred percent of the formula need for such district for
the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which
aid is being calculated.

(4) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
if the formula need calculated for a school district pursuant to subsections
(1) and (2) of this section is more than one hundred twelve percent of the
formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately preceding
the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, the formula need
for such district shall equal one hundred twelve percent of the formula need
for such district for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, except that the formula need
shall not be reduced pursuant to this subsection for any district receiving
a student growth adjustment for the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated.

(5) For purposes of subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
the formula need for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year for which aid is being calculated shall be the formula need used
in the final calculation of aid pursuant to section 79-1065 and for districts
that were affected by a reorganization with an effective date in the calendar
year preceding the calendar year in which aid is certified for the school
fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, the formula need for the school
fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is
being calculated shall be attributed to the affected school districts based
on information provided to the department by the school districts or proportionally
based on the adjusted valuation transferred if sufficient information has
not been provided to the department.

(6) For state aid calculated for the first full school fiscal
year of a new learning community, if the formula need calculated for a member
school district pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section is
less than the sum of the school district's state aid certified for the school
fiscal year immediately preceding the first full school fiscal year of the
learning community plus the school district's other actual receipts included
in local system formula resources pursuant to section 79-1018.01 for such
school fiscal year plus the product of the school district's general fund
levy for such school fiscal year up to one dollar and five cents multiplied
by the school district's assessed valuation for such school fiscal year, the
formula need for such school district for the school fiscal year for which
aid is being calculated shall equal such sum.

Laws 2008, LB988, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB1153, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 8;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 9;

Laws 2013, LB407, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB967, § 12.
April 3, 2014